New York, session 2025-2026, S3686.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The elder law is amended by adding a new section 226 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 226. Senior tenants' advocate. 1. Bureau established. There is here- 4 by established within the office for the aging a bureau of the senior 5 tenants' advocate for the purpose of assisting senior tenants in resolv- 6 ing complaints they may have with the New York state division of housing 7 and community renewal, landlord disputes, rent increases, and other 8 housing related matters. 9 2. Appointment of senior tenants' advocate. The governor shall appoint 10 a state senior tenants' advocate to administer and supervise the bureau 11 of the senior tenants' advocate. The senior tenants' advocate shall: 12 (a) be an employee of the office for the aging; 13 (b) be selected from among individuals with expertise and experience 14 in landlord and tenant law and with other qualifications appropriate for 15 the position; 16 (c) have the authority to appoint one or more authorized represen- 17 tatives to assist the senior tenants' advocate in the performance of 18 such tenants' advocate's duties under this section and, if necessary, 19 perform the duties of the senior tenants' advocate on their behalf; and 20 (d) report directly to the director of the office for the aging. 21 3. Duties of the senior tenants' advocate. The senior tenants' advo- 22 cate shall: 23 (a) identify and assist in the resolution of complaints that are made 24 by, or on behalf of, senior tenants in this state and that relate to 25 actions, inactions, or decisions that may adversely affect the housing EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05228-01-5 S. 3686 2 1 and residency rights of such senior tenants, in accordance with proce- 2 dures established by the senior tenants' advocate by making referrals to 3 the appropriate agency or agencies that may best address the complaints 4 of the senior citizen tenants; 5 (b) provide information regarding programs and agencies that can 6 assist senior tenants in resolving their complaints; 7 (c) analyze and monitor the development and implementation of federal, 8 state, and local laws, regulations, or policies with respect to the 9 adequacy of housing matters for senior tenants within the state; and 10 (d) carry out such other activities as the senior tenants' advocate 11 determines to be appropriate pursuant to pertinent state laws and regu- 12 lations. 13 4. Review of complaint. Upon receipt of a complaint, the senior 14 tenants' advocate shall determine immediately which agency would be most 15 appropriate for the purposes of forwarding such complaint. The senior 16 tenants' advocate shall then forward the complaint and inform the tenant 17 making the complaint where such complaint was forwarded. 18 5. Records. The senior tenants' advocate shall maintain such records 19 as are determined necessary by the office for the aging. Any state agen- 20 cy receiving a complaint pursuant to this subdivision shall provide the 21 senior tenants' advocate with written notice of the receipt of such 22 complaint. 23 6. Retaliatory discrimination prohibited. No person shall discriminate 24 against any tenant because such tenant, or any person acting on behalf 25 of such tenant, has brought or caused to be brought any complaint to the 26 senior tenants' advocate for referral, or against any other person who 27 has given or provided or is to give or provide any statements, testimo- 28 ny, other evidence, or cooperation in connection with any such 29 complaint. 30 7. Regulations. The director of the office for the aging is authorized 31 to promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this section. 32 8. Annual report. The state senior tenants' advocate shall submit an 33 annual report to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, 34 the speaker of the assembly, and the director, and make such report 35 available to the public. Such report shall: 36 (a) describe the activities carried out by the bureau of the senior 37 tenants' advocate during the prior calendar year; 38 (b) contain and analyze data relating to complaints concerning resi- 39 dential housing for senior citizen tenants, for the purpose of identify- 40 ing and resolving recurring problems; 41 (c) evaluate the problems experienced by, and the complaints made by 42 or on behalf of, senior citizen tenants; 43 (d) contain recommendations for: 44 (i) appropriate state legislation, rules and regulations and other 45 action to preserve and promote the rights of senior citizen tenants; and 46 (ii) improving public awareness of senior citizen tenants' rights, and 47 availability of public assistance programs to senior citizen tenants; 48 and 49 (e) any other matters that the senior tenants' advocate determines to 50 be appropriate. 51 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 52 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 53 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 54 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 55 completed on or before such effective date.